src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Central Siberian Yupik language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON Cases
+N+sg+nom:0     #   ;
+N+pl+nom:i     #   ;
+N+sg+loc:as    #   ;
+N+pl+loc:ias   #   ;
+N+sg+acc:at    #   ;
+N+pl+acc:iat   #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
